Hawaii statutes.
§165-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Farming operation" means a
commercial agricultural, silvicultural, or aquacultural facility or pursuit
conducted, in whole or in part, including the care and production of livestock
and livestock products, poultry and poultry products, apiary products, and
plant and animal production for nonfood uses; the planting, cultivating,
harvesting, and processing of crops; and the farming or ranching of any plant
or animal species in a controlled salt, brackish, or freshwater environment.
"Farming operation" includes but shall not be limited to:

(1) Agricultural-based commercial operations as
described in section [205-2(d)(15)];

(2) Noises, odors, dust, and fumes emanating from a
commercial agricultural or an aquacultural facility or pursuit;

(3) Operation of machinery and irrigation pumps;

(4) Ground and aerial seeding and spraying;

(5) The application of chemical fertilizers,
conditioners, insecticides, pesticides, and herbicides; and

(6) The employment and use of labor.

A farming operation that conducts processing
operations or salt, brackish, or freshwater aquaculture operations on land that
is zoned for industrial, commercial, or other nonagricultural use shall not, by
reason of that zoning, fall beyond the scope of this definition; provided that
those processing operations form an integral part of operations that otherwise
meet the requirements of this definition.

"Nuisance" means any interference
with reasonable use and enjoyment of land, including but not limited to smoke,
odors, dust, noise, or vibration; provided that nothing in this chapter shall
in any way restrict or impede the authority of the State to protect the public
health, safety, and welfare. "Nuisance" as used in this chapter,
includes all claims that meet the requirements of this definition regardless of
whether a complainant designates such claims as brought in nuisance,
negligence, trespass, or any other area of law or equity; provided that
nuisance as used in this chapter does not include an alleged nuisance that
involves water pollution or flooding. [L 1982, c 256, pt of §1; am L 1986, c
242, §2; am L 1993, c 162, §2; am L 2001, c 26, §1; am L 2012, c 113, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next